Illinois, session 104th, HB3316.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by adding 5Section 31-10 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/31-10 new)7    Sec. 31-10. Obstruction of the Ombudsperson.8    (a) A person commits obstruction of the Ombudsperson when 9he or she:10        (1) intentionally interferes with or prevents the 11    completion of the work of the Department of Corrections 12    Independent Ombudsperson described in Article 2.1 of 13    Chapter III of the Unified Code of Corrections; 14        (2) knowingly offers compensation to the Department of 15    Corrections Independent Ombudsperson in an effort to 16    affect the outcome of an investigation or a potential 17    investigation; 18        (3) knowingly or intentionally retaliates against an 19    offender or another person who provides information to the 20    Department of Corrections Independent Ombudsperson; or 21        (4) makes threats because of an investigation or 22    potential investigation against: 23            (A) the Department of Corrections Independent   HB3316- 2 -LRB104 12030 RLC 22125 b1        Ombudsperson; 2            (B) a person who has filed a complaint; or 3            (C) a person who provides information to the 4        Department of Corrections Independent Ombudsperson. 5    (b) Sentence. Obstruction of the Ombudsperson is a Class A 6misdemeanor.  7    Section 10. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 8adding Article 2.1 to Chapter III as follows: 9    (730 ILCS 5/Ch. III Art. 2.1 heading new)10ARTICLE 2.1. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS INDEPENDENT 11OMBUDSPERSON 12    (730 ILCS 5/3-2.1-1 new)13    Sec. 3-2.1-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as 14the Department of Corrections Independent Ombudsperson Law. 15    (730 ILCS 5/3-2.1-5 new)16    Sec. 3-2.1-5. Definitions. In this Article:17        "Bureau" means the Department of Corrections 18    Ombudsperson Bureau established in this Article, including 19    persons approved to act in the capacity of Ombudsperson by 20    the Bureau. 21        "Department" means the Department of Corrections. 22        "Ombudsperson" means an employee of the Bureau who   HB3316- 3 -LRB104 12030 RLC 22125 b1    investigates and resolves complaints that the Department 2    endangered the health and safety of any person or that the 3    Department violated specific laws, rules, or written 4    policies.  5    (730 ILCS 5/3-2.1-10 new)6    Sec. 3-2.1-10. Department of Corrections Ombudsperson 7Bureau. The Department of Corrections Ombudsperson Bureau is 8established as a separate bureau within the Department. 9    (730 ILCS 5/3-2.1-15 new)10    Sec. 3-2.1-15. Director of the Bureau; employees.11    (a) The Governor shall appoint a Director of the Bureau 12within 30 days of the effective date of this amendatory Act of 13the 104th General Assembly. The Governor shall appoint a 14successor Director within 30 days after a vacancy occurs in 15the position of the director. The Director shall serve at the 16pleasure of the Governor.17    (b) The Director may employ technical experts and other 18employees to carry out the purposes of this Article. The 19Director may not hire a person to serve as an Ombudsperson who 20has been employed by the Department during the proceeding 21year. 22    (c) The Department shall provide and maintain office space 23for the Bureau.    HB3316- 4 -LRB104 12030 RLC 22125 b1    (730 ILCS 5/3-2.1-20 new)2    Sec. 3-2.1-20. Powers of Ombudsperson.3    (a) The Ombudsperson may receive, investigate, and attempt 4to resolve complaints that the Department:5        (1) violated a specific law, rule, or Department 6    written policy; or 7        (2) endangered the health or safety or any person. 8    However, the Ombudsperson shall not investigate a 9complaint from an employee of the Department that relates to 10the employee's employment relationship with the Department. 11The Ombudsperson shall not investigate complaints alleging 12violations of the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act. If 13the Ombudsperson determines that a possible violation of the 14State Officials and Employees Ethics Act has occurred, he or 15she shall immediately refer the incident to the Office of the 16Inspector General. 17    (b) At the conclusion of an investigation of a complaint, 18the Ombudsperson shall report his or her findings to the 19complainant. 20    (c) If the Ombudsperson does not investigate a complaint, 21the Ombudsperson shall notify the complainant of the decision 22not to investigate and the reasons for the decision. 23    (d) The Ombudsperson shall create a monthly report that 24includes a summary of the findings of all substantiated 25complaints. 26    (e) The Ombudsperson may conduct investigations of alleged   HB3316- 5 -LRB104 12030 RLC 22125 b1violations of Department policy, State or federal laws, and 2Department rules at any Department facility. 3    (f) The Ombudsperson may recommend changes to the Director 4of the Department concerning Department policies or practices 5based upon information learned or observations made by the 6Ombudsperson during the course of an investigation. 7    (g) If the Ombudsperson discovers evidence that the 8Ombudsperson reasonably believes constitutes the commission of 9a crime, the Ombudsperson immediately shall, if the 10Ombudsperson considers it appropriate, inform the Director of 11the Department, who shall conduct an investigation. If, after 12conducting the investigation, the Director has reasonable 13suspicion to believe that a crime has been committed, the 14Director shall: 15        (1) if the crime involves any person who is not an 16    offender, immediately report the crime to an appropriate 17    law enforcement agency; and 18        (2) if no person other than the offender is involved 19    in the crime, immediately report the crime to an 20    appropriate law enforcement agency if the Director 21    believes that the prison disciplinary process is not 22    appropriate.  23    (730 ILCS 5/3-2.1-25 new)24    Sec. 3-2.1-25. Access to records and facilities.25    (a) An Ombudsperson shall be given:  HB3316- 6 -LRB104 12030 RLC 22125 b1        (1) appropriate access to the records of an offender 2    who files a complaint under this Article; and 3        (2) immediate access to any correctional facility 4    administered or supervised by the Department. 5    (b) A State or local government agency or entity that has 6records that are relevant to a complaint or an investigation 7conducted by the Ombudsperson shall provide the Ombudsperson 8with access to the records. 9    (c) A person is immune from: 10        (1) civil or criminal liability; and 11        (2) actions taken under a professional disciplinary 12    procedure dealing with an employee of the Department.  13    (730 ILCS 5/3-2.1-30 new)14    Sec. 3-2.1-30. Duties of Ombudsperson.15    (a) The Ombudsperson shall:16        (1) establish procedures to receive and investigate 17    complaints; 18        (2) establish access controls for all information 19    maintained by the Bureau; and 20        (3) except as is necessary to investigate and resolve 21    a complaint, ensure that the identity of a complainant 22    will not be disclosed without: 23            (A) the complainant's written consent; or 24            (B) a court order. 25    (b) The correspondence and communication between the   HB3316- 7 -LRB104 12030 RLC 22125 b1Ombudsperson and any person is a privileged communication.  2    (730 ILCS 5/3-2.1-35 new)3    Sec. 3-2.1-35. Rulemaking; liability. 4    (a) The Bureau may adopt rules to carry out its duties 5under this Article. 6    (b) The Ombudsperson is not civilly liable for the good 7faith performance of official duties.  8    (730 ILCS 5/3-2.1-40 new)9    Sec. 3-2.1-40. Reporting. The Director of the Bureau shall 10prepare a report each year on the operations of the Bureau. A 11copy of the report shall be provided to the Governor, the 12General Assembly, and the Director of the Department.  HB3316- 8 -LRB104 12030 RLC 22125 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    720 ILCS 5/31-10 new4    730 ILCS 5/Art. Ch. III 5    Art. 2.1 heading new6    730 ILCS 5/3-2.1-1 new7    730 ILCS 5/3-2.1-5 new8    730 ILCS 5/3-2.1-10 new9    730 ILCS 5/3-2.1-15 new10    730 ILCS 5/3-2.1-20 new11    730 ILCS 5/3-2.1-25 new12    730 ILCS 5/3-2.1-30 new13    730 ILCS 5/3-2.1-35 new14    730 ILCS 5/3-2.1-40 new